Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 3. Arrest, Bail, Bonds, and Recognizances

§ 6001.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 6002.
Bailpiece—surety in jail bond taken on execution.

Bailpiece to be Furnished a Surety in a Jail Bond Taken on an Execution

STATE OF VERMONT,
On the day of County, ss.
}
A. D. 20 , A. B. of in the county of was bailed by C. D. of in the county of , to the liberties of the jail yard in in the county of , on an execution in favor of E. F. of in the county of , the sum of dollars damages, and dollars costs of action, with cents for such execution, and officers’ fees thereon to the amount of .
G. R., Jailer.

Click to view

§ 6003.
Surety for person charged with being father of illegitimate child.

Bailpiece to be Furnished the Surety for Person Charged with Being the Father of an Illegitimate Child

STATE OF VERMONT,
A. B. of in County, ss.
}
the county of is bailed by C. D. of in the county of , upon a recognizance in the sum of dollars, returnable to () at the instance of E. F.; the said C. D. having become surety for the appearance of the said A. B. before said court (or justice) at , on the day of insert name of court or justice and the time and place of session Given under my hand at , this day of A. D. 20 .
Attest,
G. H., Sheriff or Jailer. ( The warrant for arrest of principal may be as in § 6007, setting forth that the principal is charged with being the father of an illegitimate child, instead of with a crime.)

Click to view

§ 6004.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 6005.
Warrant—issued on bailpiece furnished to surety in jail bond.

Warrant to be Issued on the Bailpiece Furnished to a Surety in
Jail Bond

(Commencement and direction as in § 5903.)

Whereas it has been made to appear to me, on application of C. D. of in the county of , that on the day of A.D. 20 , at in the county of , one A. B. of in the county of , then a prisoner in the common jail in in the county of , on an execution in favor of E. F. of in the county of , for the sum of dollars damages, and for the sum of dollars costs of action, and cents for such execution, and officer’s fees thereon to the amount of , was bailed to the liberties of the aforesaid jail yard by the said C. D.; and the said C. D. having prayed for a warrant to recommit the said A. B., agreeably to the statute in such case made and provided; Therefore, by the authority of the State of Vermont, you are hereby commanded to apprehend the body of the said A. B., and him or her safely keep until he or she pays the sums above mentioned, or is released from imprisonment by the creditor, or otherwise by order of law. (Conclusion and date as in § 5912.)

Click to view

J. I., Justice of the Peace.

§ 6006.
Request therefor for arrest of principal in relief of bail.

Request for a Warrant for the Arrest of a Principal in Relief
of Bail

Whereas I, A. B., on day of A.D. 20 , became bail for C. D., in the sum of dollars, for his or her appearance before the Superior Court within and for the county of , on the day of next; the said C. D. being charged with the crime of ; I now request you to grant me a warrant, in due form of law, to apprehend the body of the said C. D., that I may commit him or her to jail in the county of , in discharge of my recognizance. Dated at, etc. A. B.

Click to view

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 6007.
Arrest of principal in relief of bail.

Warrant for Arrest of Principal in Relief of Bail

STATE OF VERMONT,
To any sheriff or constable in County, ss.
the State or to
}
an indifferent person,
Greeting: Whereas A. B. of , on the day of A.D. 20 , became bail for the appearance of C. D. before the Superior Court next to be held at , within and for the county of , on the day of A.D. 20 , charged with the crime of , in the sum of dollars; and whereas the said A. B. has this day filed with me his or her application, in writing, praying for a warrant to arrest the said C. D., to commit him or her to jail in discharge of the recognizance of the said A. B.; Therefore, by the authority of the State of Vermont, you are hereby commanded to apprehend the body of the said C. D., and him or her commit to the keeper of the jail in the county of , within said jail, who is hereby commanded to receive the body of the said C. D., and him or her safely keep until he or she is discharged according to law. Fail not, but service and return make according to law. Dated at in the county of , the day of A.D. 20 .
, Justice of the Peace, Judge, or Clerk.

Click to view

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 6008.
Condition of jail bond.

Condition of a Jail Bond

The condition of the above obligation is such, that whereas the above bounden , now a prisoner in the common jail in in the county of and State of Vermont, by virtue of an execution in favor of of in the county of and State of , for the sum of dollars and cents debt (or damages) and costs, and for the sum of dollars and cents costs, with cents for such execution and the officer’s fees on the same, to the amount of , issued on a judgment recovered before () and signed by () now a prisoner in the common jail, etc., at the suit of of in the county of and State of , demanding in his or her writ, debt (or damages) to the amount of dollars. here set forth court, time, etc., here mention the authority signing the execution, or, when the bond is taken on mesne process, insert in the condition, Now, if the said faithfully and absolutely remains within the limits of such jail yard, and does not depart therefrom until he or she is lawfully discharged, without committing any escape before such discharge, or doing any act by which the sheriff, as aforesaid, is damnified, in consequence of admitting the said to the liberties of such jail yard; but at all times indemnifies and saves harmless the sheriff, in the premises; then this obligation to be void and of no effect, otherwise of force. Signed, sealed and
(L.S.) delivered in presence of
}
(L.S.)

Click to view

§ 6009.
Poor debtor—oath.

Poor Debtor’s Oath

The oath to poor debtors shall be administered by the commissioners of jail delivery in the following form:

“You solemnly swear that you have not estate, real or personal, to the amount of $20.00, nor sufficient to satisfy the execution on which you are committed, except such as is exempt from execution; and that you have not, directly or indirectly, disposed of any part of your estate to defraud your creditors; and that you have not, since your commitment, disposed of any of your property to defraud the creditor on whose execution you are committed.
So help you God.”

§ 6010.
Commissioner’s certificate on admission to oath.

The certificate to be delivered by the commissioners to the prisoner admitted to the poor debtor’s oath shall be substantially as follows:

STATE OF VERMONT, To all whom it may concern, County, ss.
}
Greeting: , a prisoner confined in the jail in in the county of , on an execution in favor of of in the county of and State of , dated the day of , 20 , for dollars and cents damages (or debt) and dollars and cents cost, signed by , has this day been admitted to the poor debtor’s oath, and ought to be discharged. The creditor was (or was not) notified, and did (or did not) attend. Given under our hands at , this day of , 20
}
Commissioners.

Click to view

§ 6011.
Treasurer’s bond.

Know all men by these presents, that I, A. B. of in the county of , as principal, and we, C. D. and E. F. of in the county of , as sureties, acknowledge ourselves jointly and severally indebted to the , in the penal sum of dollars, current money of the United States, for the payment of which, well and truly to be made, we jointly and severally bind ourselves, our and each of our heirs, executors and administrators, firmly by these presents. Signed with our hands, sealed with our seals and dated this day of A.D. 20 . The condition of the above obligation is such that if the said A. B. well and faithfully executes the office of for the ensuing, and at all times well and faithfully accounts for all the monies and other matters and things which come into his or her hands and possession by virtue of his or her office, and well and faithfully performs all and singular the other duties and requirements thereof according to law, then this obligation to be void, otherwise of force. Signed, sealed and
A.B.
(L.S.) delivered in presence
C.D.
(L.S.) of
}
E.F.
(L.S.)

Click to view